South Dakota, session 2026, SB71.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-44:
The Department of Transportation may, by agreement with the federal government
pursuant to 23 U.S.C. §§ 326 and 327, assume all or part of the responsibilities of the
federal government under the National Environmental Policy Act, as set forth under 42
U.S.C. §§ 4321 to 4370, inclusive, for environmental review, consultation, or other actions
required with respect to highway projects within this state.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-44:
In cases that involve compliance, discharge, or enforcement of responsibilities
assumed by the Department of Transportation under section 1 of this Act, this state waives
sovereign immunity from suit in federal court provided under the Eleventh Amendment to
the Constitution of the United States.
Section 3. That § 31-2-38 be AMENDED:
31-2-38. Notwithstanding any limitation in § 31-2-13.2 or 31-2-14.2, the State of
South Dakota shall pay to any successful litigant in an action brought pursuant to this
chapter or with respect to any highway or public transportation project pursuant to section
1 of this Act, the amount of damages awarded and the amount of attorney fees and costs
assessed against this state, out of the state highway fund from all the moneys levied and
collected by the state by general state taxation for state highway purposes, or
appropriated for state highway purposes.

26.481.17 2 71
An Act to authorize the assumption of certain responsibilities and the waiver of sovereign
immunity in connection with certain actions under federal environmental law.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 71
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 71 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB71 ENROLLED